Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3414
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Domestic Abuse Death Review Act:

(1) Associated victim means a family or household member of the decedent victim who also experienced abuse committed by the perpetrator;

(2) Decedent victim means a person who died by homicide or suicide as a result of domestic abuse;

(3) Domestic abuse means abuse as defined in section 42-903;

(4) Domestic abuse death means:

(a) A homicide that involves, or is a result of, domestic abuse;

(b) The death of a decedent victim who was a member of a law enforcement agency, emergency medical service, or other agency responding to a domestic abuse incident;

(c) The death of a decedent victim who was responding to a domestic abuse incident; or

(d) A suicide of a decedent victim if there are circumstances indicating the suicide involved, or was the result of, domestic abuse within two years prior to the suicide, including: (i) The decedent victim had applied for or received a protection order against the perpetrator within two years prior to the suicide; (ii) the decedent victim had received counseling, treatment, or sought other supportive services as a result of the domestic abuse within two years prior to the suicide; or (iii) the decedent victim had reported domestic abuse to law enforcement within two years prior to the suicide;

(5) Family or household member has the same meaning as in section 42-903;

(6) Investigation means a domestic abuse death investigation as described in section 71-3415;

(7) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the county sheriff, and the Nebraska State Patrol;

(8) Perpetrator means the person who has been the predominant aggressor of domestic abuse;

(9) Survivor of domestic abuse means a person who is a current or prior victim of domestic abuse; and

(10) Team means the State Domestic Abuse Death Review Team as provided in section 71-3416.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 39.